anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
@P.noun.Indep@     NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
@P.noun.DepKin@    NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES ;
@P.noun.DepNonKin@ NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES ;
LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit2%<  PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit2%<  PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@ot2%<     PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.NULL@                    PRENOUNS_GATE ;
LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      PRENOUNS_GATE ;
LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.MI@0:@P.person.MI@0mi4%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
LEXICON PRENOUNS_GATE
NOUNSTEMS_GATE ;
PRENOUNS ;
LEXICON PRENOUNS_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%^EGLOT%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%^EGLOT%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
LEXICON NOUNSTEMS_GATE
@R.noun.Indep@     NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;
@R.noun.DepKin@    NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS ;
@R.noun.DepNonKin@ NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;
LEXICON NA_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NA ;
LEXICON NA_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NA ;
LEXICON NA_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NA ;
LEXICON NA_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NA ;
LEXICON NA_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NA ;
LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NA_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NA_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NA_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NA_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM
@P.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM ;
LEXICON NA_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NA_POSS/IM ;
LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NA_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NA_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NAD_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NAD_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NAD_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NAD_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/A
@P.sg.A@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/I
@P.sg.I@ NAD ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/A_POSS/IM
@P.sg.A@ NAD_POSS/IM ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NAD_POSS/IM ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.A@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.A@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NAD_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NI ;
LEXICON NI_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NI ;
LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NI ;
LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NI ;
LEXICON NI_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NI ;
LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NI_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NI_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NI_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NI_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NI_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NI_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;
LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NID ;
LEXICON NID_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NID ;
LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NID ;
LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NID ;
LEXICON NID_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NID ;
LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NID_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NID_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NID_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NID_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NID_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NID_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NID_SG/I
@P.sg.I@ NID ;
LEXICON NID_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NID_POSS/IM ;
LEXICON NID_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.A@ NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NID_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NID_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
LEXICON NA
+N+A:0 NA_POSS_GATE1 ;
LEXICON NAD
@P.dep.DEP@+N+A+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NA_POSS_GATE1 ;
LEXICON NI
+N+I:0 NI_POSS_GATE1 ;
LEXICON NID
@P.dep.DEP@+N+I+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NI_POSS_GATE1 ;
LEXICON NA_POSS_GATE1
@D.person.NULL@ NA_THEME_SUFFIX1 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NA_DIM_GATE ;
LEXICON NA_THEME_SUFFIX1
@D.theme.IM@0                                                    NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                     NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@0                                         NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                        NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NA_DIM_GATE
@P.dim.NULL@                          NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dep@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep@           NA_DIM_SUFFIX ;
@R.dep.DEP@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@ NA_DIM_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON NA_DIM_SUFFIX
@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                               NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis                         NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                                     NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis                                   NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs     NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis   NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs   NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis     NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
LEXICON NA_POSS_GATE2
@D.person.NULL@ NA_THEME_SUFFIX2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NA_THEME_SUFFIX2
@D.theme.IM2@0                                                                             NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                                      NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NA_POSS_SUFFIXES
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NI@@C.sg@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@@C.sg@%>i2nân  NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px12Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2naw NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2wâw  NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@C.sg@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@0%>i2wâw   NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@C.sg@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@%>i2thiw NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@D.loc.NULL@ NA_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NA_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2thihk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk          NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Distr:@U.person.MI@%>i2nâhk      NOUN_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@@D.person.O@ NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ;
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@D.person.NULL@@R.person.O@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@R.person.O@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@D.number.SG@@D.person.O@+Pl:@D.number.SG@@D.person.O@%>ak NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@D.loc.NULL@@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@D.loc.NULL@@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Distr:@R.person.NULL@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.sg.A@+Sg:@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON NI_POSS_GATE1
@D.person.NULL@ NI_THEME_SUFFIX1 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NI_DIM_GATE ;
LEXICON NI_THEME_SUFFIX1
@D.theme.IM@0                                                    NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                     NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@0                                         NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                        NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NI_DIM_GATE
@P.dim.NULL@                          NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dep@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep@           NI_DIM_SUFFIX ;
@R.dep.DEP@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@ NI_DIM_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON NI_DIM_SUFFIX
@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                               NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis                         NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                                     NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis                                   NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs     NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis   NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs   NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis     NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
LEXICON NI_POSS_GATE2
@D.person.NULL@ NI_THEME_SUFFIX2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NI_THEME_SUFFIX2
@D.theme.IM2@0                                                                             NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                                      NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
LEXICON NI_POSS_SUFFIXES
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NI@@C.sg@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@@C.sg@%>i2nân  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px12Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2naw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2wâw  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@C.sg@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@0%>i2wâw   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@C.sg@@C.sg@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@@C.sg@%>i2thiw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;
